District of Columbia statutes.
47-392.23

Obtaining reports.

The Authority may require the Mayor, the Chair of the Council, the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia, and the Inspector General of the District of Columbia, to prepare and submit such reports as the Authority considers appropriate to assist it in carrying out its responsibilities under this Act, including submitting copies of any reports regarding revenues, expenditures, budgets, costs, plans, operations, estimates, and other financial or budgetary matters of the District government.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 104-8, § 223
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-392.23.

References in Text

“This Act,” referred to in this section, is the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, approved April 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 97, Pub. L. 104-8.